Washington statutes.
RCW 35.02.190

Annexation/incorporation of fire protection district—Transfer of assets when at least sixty percent of assessed valuation is annexed or incorporated in city or town.

If a portion of a fire protection district including at least sixty percent of the assessed valuation of the real property of the district is annexed to or incorporated into a city or town, ownership of all of the assets of the district shall be vested in the city or town, or, if the city or town has been annexed by another fire protection district, in the other fire protection district, upon payment in cash, properties or contracts for fire protection services to the district within one year of the date on which the city or town withdraws from the fire protection district pursuant to RCW 52.04.161, of a percentage of the value of said assets equal to the percentage of the value of the real property in entire district remaining outside the incorporated or annexed area. The fire protection district may elect, by a vote of a majority of the persons residing outside the annexed or incorporated area who vote on the proposition, to require the annexing or incorporating city or town or fire protection district to assume responsibility for the provision of fire protection, and for the operation and maintenance of the district's property, facilities, and equipment throughout the district and to pay the city or town or fire protection district a reasonable fee for such fire protection, operation, and maintenance. When at least sixty percent, but less than one hundred percent, valuation of the real estate of a district is annexed to or incorporated into a city or town, a proportionate share of the liabilities of the district at the time of such annexation or incorporation, equal to the percentage of the total assessed valuation of the real estate of the district that has been annexed or incorporated, shall be transferred to the annexing or incorporating city or town.

If all of a fire protection district is included in an area that incorporates as a city or town or is annexed to a city or town or fire protection district, all of the assets and liabilities of the fire protection district shall be transferred to the newly incorporated city or town on the date on which the fire protection district ceases to provide fire protection services pursuant to RCW 52.04.161 or to the city or town or fire protection district upon the annexation.

[ 1993 c 262 s 3; 1989 c 76 s 2; 1986 c 234 s 18; 1981 c 332 s 5; 1965 c 7 s 35.13.247. Prior: 1963 c 231 s 3. Formerly RCW 35.13.247.]